Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4632
Creditor claim: General power created by powerholder.

(a) In this section, power of appointment created by the powerholder includes a power of appointment created in a transfer by another person to the extent the powerholder contributed value to the transfer.

(b) Appointive property subject to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder is subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or of the powerholder's estate to the extent provided in the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.

(c) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, appointive property subject to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder is not subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or the powerholder's estate to the extent the powerholder irrevocably appointed the property in favor of a person other than the powerholder or the powerholder's estate.

(d) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, and notwithstanding the presence of a spendthrift provision or whether the claim arose before or after the creation of the power of appointment, appointive property subject to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder is subject to a claim of a creditor of:

(1) the powerholder, to the same extent as if the powerholder owned the appointive property, if the power is presently exercisable; and

(2) the powerholder's estate, to the extent the estate is insufficient to satisfy the claim and subject to the right of a decedent to direct the source from which liabilities are paid, if the power is exercisable at the powerholder's death.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 55.

Uniform Voidable Transactions Act, see section 36-801.